Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
324

MEDICAL
RESEARCH; MORBIDITY AND MORTALITY

INFORMATION

Part I. Maternal and Perinatal Studies

Section

324-1 Requests for information; sources of
information

protected

324-2 Identification of persons studied;
restriction

324-3 Legal proceedings; information excluded
from

324-4 Penalty

324-5 Multidisciplinary and multiagency reviews

324-6 Maternal death review reports

Part II. Mental Health and Intellectual
Disability

Studies

324-11 Sources of information protected

324-12 Identification of persons studied;
restriction

324-13 Legal proceedings; information excluded
from

324-14 Penalty

Part III. Cancer Studies

324-21 Sources of information protected

324-22 Identity of persons studied and material,
restrictions

324-23 Legal proceedings; information excluded
from

324-24 Penalty

Part IV. Health Surveillance

324-31 Identity of persons studied and material,
restrictions

324-32 Release of information

324-33 Legal proceedings; information excluded
from

324-34 Penalty

Part V. Birth Defects Studies

324-41 Definitions

324-42 Information collection

324-43 Use of collected information

324-44 Penalty

Cross References

Child death review, see §§321-341 to 346, part XXVII.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next